Hawaii, session 2026, HB2617.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: PART I SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that Act 315, Session Laws of Hawaii 1997, mandated the establishment of a Hawaiian language college at the university of Hawaii at Hilo. The language college subsequently played a major role in developing the Imiloa astronomy center to provide bilingual Hawaiian‑English science education to the community.  The Imiloa astronomy center provides outreach and science education from perspectives emanating from Hawaii's distinctive local and indigenous culture and history.  Since its establishment, the Imiloa astronomy center has worked with the college of Hawaiian language to produce a fully integrated education program, including preschool, kindergarten to grade twelve, a baccalaureate degree, a teacher certification program, a master's degree, and a doctoral program.  The Imiloa astronomy center's educational programs also include direct outreach to the general public using both technology and in-person learning.  It is the only fully integrated bilingual education program of its kind in Hawaii. The legislature further finds that the bilingual work of the college of Hawaiian language and Imiloa astronomy center is especially important to the State, because the State has two official languages. The State's schools offer both an English-language-medium education pathway and a Hawaiian-language-medium education pathway from infant and toddler programs to doctoral degrees. Act 46, Session Laws of Hawaii 2020, appropriated moneys to the Imiloa center and college of Hawaiian language to help establish a pathway for the development of Hawaiian-language-medium early education.  The college of Hawaiian language developed an early education certificate taught entirely in the Hawaiian language and based on Hawaiian grounded, scientifically researched concepts of childhood development and cognitive development. Imiloa astronomy center has also provided educational outreach to the State's students using innovative approaches and unique delivery methods that help advance Hawaii's goal of expanding Hawaiian-language-medium early education within the State. The legislature recognizes that the Imiloa astronomy center identifies Hawaiian language proficiency development as a bottleneck in the development of Hawaiian-language-medium early education teachers.  The United States Foreign Service estimates that Hawaiian-language proficiency requires approximately one thousand one hundred hours of study. This amount is much more than the standard number of hours currently allocated to Hawaiian language in most degree programs outside of the degree programs at the college of Hawaiian language.  Standard models for learning a second language and the limited scheduling of Hawaiian language courses in the State's high schools and universities both present challenges to the development of Hawaiian-language-medium early education teachers who are proficient in Hawaiian. The legislature believes that implementing an institute model for Hawaiian education at the university of Hawaii at Hilo would allow the Imiloa astronomy center's year-round scheduling flexibility to extend to the college of Hawaiian language and would give the center and college greater opportunities to develop Hawaiian language proficiency and Hawaiian-language-medium early education sites and programs. The legislature also recognizes that the university of Hawaii at Hilo leads the federally designated National Native American Language Resource Center.  This role gives the Imiloa astronomy center and college of Hawaiian language unique access to offer coursework, training, consultations, materials, and other services to federal agencies, other states, tribal nations, and mainland communities. Therefore, the development of an institute of indigenous education at the university of Hawaii at Hilo is a matter of both national and statewide concern. The legislature believes that implementing an institute model for Hawaiian language education at the university of Hawaii at Hilo is crucial to the development of a Hawaiian-language-medium early education pathway and would help reduce the State's significant shortage of Hawaiian-language-medium education teachers.  It would also expand the reach of the college of Hawaiian language and Imiloa astronomy center to help address the State's and individual communities' Hawaiian language needs.  The institute would also serve as a model for language education for other indigenous and marginalized groups, demonstrating how to offer high-quality education from a distinctive language base. Accordingly, the purpose of this part is to establish an institute of indigenous education, science, and outreach within the university of Hawaii at Hilo through a collaboration between the university of Hawaii at Hilo Imiloa astronomy center and university of Hawaii at Hilo college of Hawaiian language.  The institute shall operate as a distinct unit within the university of Hawaii with flexibility as it relates to scheduling, outreach, and functionality. SECTION 2.  Chapter 304A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new subpart to part IV to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "   .  Institute of Indigenous Education, Science, and Outreach §304A-     Institute of indigenous education, science, and outreach; established.  There is established the institute of indigenous education, science, and outreach.  The institute shall be placed within the university of Hawaii at Hilo through a collaboration between the university of Hawaii at Hilo Imiloa astronomy center and university of Hawaii at Hilo college of Hawaiian language; provided that the institute shall have flexibility as it relates to scheduling, outreach, and functionality; provided further that the institute may establish appropriate fees for its services and products. §304A-     Functions. The institute of indigenous education, science, and outreach shall: (1)  Develop and strengthen the Hawaiian language education pathway, from infant and toddler education programs through doctoral degree programs, in cooperation with partners like Aha Punana Leo, Inc.; (2)  Provide language education services to other indigenous language and autochthonous language groups, including Native American tribal nations; (3)  Provide outreach to Hawaiians, and other former residents with distinctive ties to the State, who now live outside Hawaii; and (4)  Provide outreach to scientific institutions, museums, educational organizations, governmental entities, and others regarding indigenous community engagement and the importance of representation for indigenous peoples, languages, and cultures. §304A-     Patents, copyrights, inventions, discoveries, and other rights.  Any patents, copyrights, inventions, discoveries, or other rights arising from activities of the institute of indigenous education, science, and outreach shall belong to the institute and shall be subject to policies or rules adopted by the board of regents." PART II SECTION 3.  The purpose of this part is to: (1)  Authorize the Hawaiian language college revolving fund to receive moneys from any revenue source and be used to support the university of Hawaii at Hilo Imiloa astronomy center; (2)  Require the Hawaiian early learning trust fund to be used for the Hawaiian-language-medium education pathway; and (3)  Prohibit the university of Hawaii from limiting the amount of revenue deposited into either fund and establish a cap on individual deposits into both funds. SECTION 4.  Section 304A-2270, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "[[]§304A-2270[]]  Hawaiian language college revolving fund.  (a)  There is established the Hawaiian language college revolving fund into which revenues from [the sale of Hawaiian language materials] any source, including training and personal development, evaluation services, sale of products, translation services, and consultation, shall be deposited.  Moneys deposited into this fund shall be expended to support the Hawaiian language college at the University of Hawaii at Hilo established under section [[]304A-1301[].] and the Imiloa astronomy center of Hawaii. (b)  The amount of revenue deposited into the fund shall not be limited by the university of Hawaii; provided that the total of any individual deposit shall not exceed $          ." SECTION 5.  Section 304A-2356, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "[[]§304A-2356[]]  Hawaiian early learning trust fund.  (a)  There is established the Hawaiian early learning trust fund, into which shall be deposited: (1)  Donations to the fund; (2)  Appropriations made by the legislature to the fund; (3)  Revenues regardless of their source; and (4)  Earnings on moneys in the fund. (b) The university of Hawaii at Hilo shall expend moneys in the trust fund for purposes of [Hawaiian early learning.] the Hawaiian-language-medium education pathway, including support for the university of Hawaii at Hilo's Imiloa astronomy center and the college of Hawaiian language. (c) The university of Hawaii shall submit an annual report to the legislature, no later than August 31, on the sources of moneys deposited into the fund and expenditures of moneys from the fund. (d)  The amount of revenue deposited into the fund shall not be limited by the university of Hawaii; provided that the total of any individual deposit shall not exceed $          ." PART III SECTION 6.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 7.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000.